Nevada, session 83, AB498.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 696A.190 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
696A.190 1. Every motor club shall furnish to its members a
service contract or a membership card and the following
information:
(a) The exact name of the motor club;
(b) The exact location of the motor club’s home office, [and of
its usual place of business in this state, giving] including the street,
number and city; and
(c) A description of the services or benefits to which the
member is entitled.
2. A completed application for membership and the description
of services [shall constitute] constitutes the service contract.
Sec. 2. NRS 696A.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
696A.280 The Commissioner shall license as a club agent only
an individual who has otherwise complied with this chapter, and
who has furnished evidence satisfactory to the Commissioner that
the individual:
1. Is at least 21 years of age.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. [Has been] Is a bona fide resident of this state or is a
resident of a state which [will permit] :
(a) Does not require a license to act as a club agent; or
(b) Permits residents of this state to act as club agents in such
other state.
3. Is a trustworthy [person] individual with a good reputation.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)